Missouri, session 2026, HB2531.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 99, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto six new sections, to be
known as sections 99.720, 99.722, 99.724, 99.726, 99.728, and 99.730, to read as follows:
99.720. 1. Sections 99.720 to 99.730 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Revitalizing Missouri Downtowns and Main Streets Act".
2. As used in sections 99.720 to 99.730, the following terms mean, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(2) "Qualified conversion expenditures", any amount properly chargeable to a
capital account. The term "qualified conversion expenditures" shall not include:
(a) The cost of acquisition;
(b) Any expenditure attributable to the enlargement of an existing building; or
(c) Tax-exempt properties;
(3) "Qualified converted building", any building and its structural components
if:
(a) Prior to conversion, such building was nonresidential real property, as
defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 168(e)(2)(B), as amended, which was leased, or available for
lease, to office tenants, or utilized for office purposes by the owner-occupant;
(b) Such building has been substantially converted from an office use to a
predominantly residential use, defined as more than fifty percent of the gross square
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2531 2
footage of the building, and may also include retail, or other commercial use, and may
also include accessory on-site parking; and
(c) Such building was initially placed in service at least twenty-five years before
the beginning of the conversion;
(4) "Qualified Missouri main street district", an accredited, associated, or
affiliated main street district of the Missouri main street program created pursuant to
sections 251.470 to 251.485;
(5) "Substantially converted", qualified conversion expenditures incurred
during the twenty-four-month period preceding final approval of tax credits that in total
are greater than:
(a) The adjusted basis of such building and its structural components, as
determined as of the beginning of the first day of such twenty-four-month period, or of
the holding period of the building, whichever is later; or
(b) Fifteen thousand dollars if the property is located in a qualified Missouri
main street district, or five hundred thousand dollars if the property is not located in a
qualified Missouri main street district.

In the case of any conversion which may reasonably be expected to be completed in
phases set forth in architectural plans and specifications completed before the
conversion begins, qualified conversion expenditures shall be totaled for the sixty-
month period preceding final approval of tax credits rather than the twenty-four-month
period preceding such final approval;
(6) "Upper floor housing", any housing that is attached to or contained in the
same building as commercial property, whether located on the ground floor behind the
traditional storefront or on other floors of the property.
99.722. 1. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the
department shall issue a taxpayer a credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability equal
to twenty-five percent of qualified conversion expenditures with respect to a qualified
converted building. If the amount of such tax credit exceeds the taxpayer's state tax
liability for the year in which tax credits are issued, the amount that exceeds the state
tax liability may be carried back to any of the three preceding tax years or carried
forward for credit against state tax liability for the succeeding ten tax years, or until the
full credit is used, whichever occurs first.
2. Tax credits authorized pursuant to this section may be transferred, sold, or
assigned, and shall retain the same attributes as in the hands of the assignor. Tax credits
may be transferred multiple times. In order to transfer a tax credit authorized pursuant
to this section, the assignor and assignee shall complete and submit a tax credit transfer

HB 2531 3
form provided by the department of revenue. Such transfers may be facilitated through
an intermediary entity as permitted by law without affecting the nature or attributes of
the tax credit.
3. Tax credits authorized for a partnership, a limited liability company taxed as
a partnership, or multiple owners of property shall be passed through to the partners,
members, or owners respectively pro rata, or pursuant to an executed agreement among
the partners, members, or owners documenting an alternate distribution method.
4. The assignee of a tax credit may use the acquired tax credits to offset up to one
hundred percent of the taxpayer's state tax liability. The assignor shall perfect such
transfer by notifying the department in writing within thirty calendar days following
the effective date of the transfer and shall provide any information as may be required
by the department.
99.724. 1. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the
department shall issue a taxpayer a credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability equal
to thirty percent of qualified conversion expenditures with respect to upper floor
housing located in a qualified Missouri main street district. If the amount of such tax
credit exceeds the taxpayer's state tax liability for the year in which tax credits are
issued, the amount that exceeds the state tax liability may be carried back to any of the
three preceding tax years or carried forward for credit against state tax liability for the
succeeding ten tax years, or until the full credit is used, whichever occurs first.
2. Tax credits authorized pursuant to this section may be transferred, sold, or
assigned, and shall retain the same attributes as in the hands of the assignor. Tax credits
may be transferred multiple times. In order to transfer a tax credit authorized pursuant
to this section, the assignor and assignee shall complete and submit a tax credit transfer
form provided by the department of revenue. Such transfers may be facilitated through
an intermediary entity as permitted by law without affecting the nature or attributes of
the tax credit.
3. Tax credits authorized for a partnership, a limited liability company taxed as
a partnership, or multiple owners of property shall be passed through to the partners,
members, or owners respectively pro rata, or pursuant to an executed agreement among
the partners, members, or owners documenting an alternate distribution method.
4. The assignee of a tax credit may use the acquired tax credits to offset up to one
hundred percent of the taxpayer's state tax liability. The assignor shall perfect such
transfer by notifying the department in writing within thirty calendar days following
the effective date of the transfer and shall provide any information as may be required
by the department.

HB 2531 4
99.726. 1. The total amount of tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 99.720
to 99.730 shall not exceed fifty million dollars in any fiscal year.
2. Fifty percent of the maximum amount of tax credits available to be authorized
to taxpayers in a fiscal year pursuant to this section shall be authorized solely for
structures of more than seven hundred fifty thousand gross square feet. If the total
amount of such reserved tax credits have been authorized, structures of more than seven
hundred fifty thousand gross square feet may receive tax credits from the remaining
unreserved amount of tax credits. If the total amount of reserved tax credits have not
been authorized by the department, structures of less than seven hundred fifty thousand
gross square feet may be authorized tax credits from such reserved amount. The total
amount of tax credits for a structure of more than seven hundred fifty thousand gross
square feet may be allocated to the annual limits provided in this section over a period of
up to ten years, if:
(1) The project otherwise meets all the requirements of sections 99.720 to 99.730;
and
(2) The project meets the ten percent incurred costs test under subsection 6 of
section 99.728 within thirty-six months after an award is authorized.
3. Twenty-five percent of the maximum amount of tax credits available to be
authorized to taxpayers in a fiscal year pursuant to this section shall be authorized
solely for upper floor housing projects located in a qualified Missouri main street
district. If the total amount of such reserved tax credits have been authorized, upper
floor housing projects located in a qualified Missouri main street district may receive
tax credits from the remaining unreserved amount of tax credits. If the total amount of
reserved tax credits have not been authorized by the department, projects not located in
a qualified Missouri main street district may be authorized tax credits from such
reserved amount.
4. If the maximum amount of tax credits allowed in any fiscal year, as provided
pursuant to this section, is authorized, the maximum amount of tax credits allowed
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall be adjusted by the percentage increase in
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, or its successor index, as such
index is defined and officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, or its
successor agency. Only one such adjustment shall be made for each instance in which
the provisions of this subsection apply. The department shall publish such adjusted
amount.
5. In the event the department authorizes tax credits equal to the total amount
available pursuant to this section, or sufficient that when totaled with all other
approvals, the amount available pursuant to this section is exhausted, all taxpayers with

HB 2531 5
applications then awaiting approval or thereafter submitted for approval shall be
notified by the department that no additional approvals shall be granted during the
fiscal year and shall be notified of the priority given to such taxpayer's application then
awaiting approval. Such applications shall be kept on file by the department and shall
be considered for approval for tax credits in the order established in this section in the
event that additional tax credits become available due to the rescission of approvals, or
when a new fiscal year's allocation of tax credits becomes available for approval.
99.728. 1. To obtain approval for tax credits pursuant to sections 99.720 to
99.730, a taxpayer shall submit an application for tax credit authorization to the
department. The department shall have sixty days to review the application and shall
notify the applicant in writing within thirty days of the decision of whether the
application has been authorized for tax credits. Each application for approval,
including any applications received for supplemental allocations of tax credits as
provided pursuant to subsection 2 of section 99.730, shall, if approved, be authorized for
tax credits in the order of submission.
2. Each application shall be reviewed by the department for approval. In order
to receive approval, an application shall include:
(1) Proof of ownership or site control. Proof of ownership shall include evidence
that the taxpayer is the fee simple owner of the eligible property, such as a warranty
deed or a closing statement. Proof of site control may be evidenced by a leasehold
interest or an option to acquire such an interest. If the taxpayer is in the process of
acquiring fee simple ownership, proof of site control shall include an executed sales
contract or an executed option to purchase the eligible property;
(2) Floor plans of the existing structure, architectural plans, and, where
applicable, plans of the proposed conversion of the structure, as well as proposed
additions;
(3) The estimated cost of conversion, the anticipated total costs of the project, the
actual basis of the property, as shown by proof of actual acquisition costs, the
anticipated total labor costs, the estimated project start date, and the estimated project
completion date;
(4) Proof that the property is an eligible property;
(5) A copy of all land use and building approvals reasonably necessary for the
commencement of the project; and
(6) Any other information which the department may reasonably require to
review the project for approval.


HB 2531 6
Only the property for which a property address is provided in the application shall be
reviewed for approval. Once selected for review, a taxpayer shall not be permitted to
request the review of another property for approval in the place of the property
contained in such application. Any disapproved application shall be removed from the
review process. If an application is removed from the review process, the department
shall notify the taxpayer in writing of the decision to remove such application. The
taxpayer may subsequently submit a revised application. For the purposes of
determining the order of submission and authorization of credits, the revised
application shall be considered a new application.
3. If the department determines that the application meets the requirements of
sections 99.720 to 99.730 to receive an authorization of tax credits, the taxpayer shall be
notified in writing of the approval for an amount of tax credits equal to the amounts
provided in sections 99.722 and 99.724, less any amount of tax credits previously
approved pursuant to this section. Tax credits approved pursuant to this section shall
be approved and administered independently and shall not be evaluated in conjunction
with any other state tax credit program. Such approvals shall be granted to applications
in the order of priority established under this section and shall require full compliance
thereafter with all other requirements of law as a condition to any claim for such tax
credits.
4. Following approval of an application, the identity of the taxpayer contained in
such application shall not be modified except:
(1) The taxpayer may add partners, members, or shareholders as part of the
ownership structure, so long as the principal remains the same; provided, however, that
subsequent to the commencement of renovation and the expenditure of at least ten
percent of the proposed rehabilitation budget, removal of the principal for failure to
perform duties and the appointment of a new principal thereafter shall not constitute a
change of the principal; or
(2) Where the ownership of the project is changed due to a foreclosure, deed in
lieu of a foreclosure or voluntary conveyance, or a transfer in bankruptcy.
5. All taxpayers with applications receiving approval shall submit within one
hundred twenty days following the award of credits evidence of the capacity of the
applicant to finance the costs and expenses for the conversion of the eligible property in
the form of a line of credit or letter of commitment subject to the lender's termination
for a material adverse change impacting the extension of credit. If the department
determines that a taxpayer has failed to comply with the requirements of this
subsection, then the department shall notify the applicant of such failure and the

HB 2531 7
applicant shall have a thirty-day period from the date of such notice to submit
additional evidence to remedy the failure.
6. All taxpayers with applications receiving approval, excluding projects
described in subsection 2 of section 99.726, shall commence conversion within twelve
months of the date of issuance of the letter from the department granting the approval
for tax credits. For the purposes of this subsection, "commence conversion" shall mean
that, as of the date in which actual physical work, contemplated by the architectural
plans submitted with the application, has begun, the taxpayer has incurred no less than
ten percent of the estimated costs of rehabilitation provided in the application.
Taxpayers with approval of a project shall submit evidence of compliance with the
provisions of this subsection. If the department determines that a taxpayer has failed to
comply with the requirements of this subsection, the approval for the amount of tax
credits for such taxpayer shall be rescinded and such amount of tax credits shall then be
included in the total amount of tax credits from which approvals may be granted. Any
taxpayer whose approval shall be subject to rescission shall be notified of such from the
department and, upon receipt of such notice, may submit a new application for the
project.
99.730. 1. To claim a tax credit authorized pursuant to sections 99.720 to 99.730,
a taxpayer with approval shall, except with respect to a tax credit authorized pursuant
to subsection 2 of section 99.726, apply for final approval and issuance of tax credits
from the department, which shall determine the final amount of qualified conversion
expenditures and whether the completed rehabilitation meets the requirements of this
section. A taxpayer shall submit to the department a final application demonstrating:
(1) That the taxpayer has substantially converted a qualified converted building
or upper floor housing;
(2) Satisfactory evidence of any qualified conversion expenditures for the
structure, as determined by the department; and
(3) Any other information reasonably requested by the department relating to
verifying qualified conversion expenditures or compliance with the requirements of
sections 99.720 to 99.730.

For financial institutions, tax credits authorized pursuant to sections 99.720 to 99.730
shall be deemed to be redevelopment tax credits for the purposes of sections 135.800 to
135.830. The approval of all applications and the issuing of certificates of eligible tax
credits to taxpayers shall be performed by the department. The department shall
inform a taxpayer of final approval by letter and shall issue, to the taxpayer, tax credit

HB 2531 8
certificates. The taxpayer shall attach the certificate to all Missouri income tax returns
on which the credit is claimed.
2. (1) The department shall issue seventy-five percent of the approved tax
credits within sixty days of receiving all required final application materials. Within
sixty days, the department shall make a final determination of costs and issue the
remaining twenty-five percent of approved tax credits, or request repayment from the
applicant if the final determination results in an over-issuance of tax credits. In the
event the amount of qualified conversion expenditures incurred by a taxpayer would
result in the issuance of an amount of tax credits in excess of the amount authorized
pursuant to subsection 3 of section 99.728, such taxpayer may apply to the department
for issuance of tax credits in an amount equal to such excess. Applications for issuance
of tax credits in excess of the amount provided under a taxpayer's application shall be
made on a form prescribed by the department. Such applications shall be subject to all
provisions regarding priority provided under subsection 1 of section 99.728.
(2) For tax credits authorized pursuant to subsection 2 of section 99.726, the
applicant may submit to the department an application for the issuance of tax credits
annually prior to final completion of the project. Upon approval of the annual
application for issuance, the department shall issue eighty percent of the amount of tax
credits that would result from the qualified expenditures, provided the total amount of
credits issued to date does not exceed the total amount of credits authorized for the
project to date. Any remaining authorized tax credits shall be issued upon the final
approval of the project. The department shall issue eighty percent of the approved
credits within sixty days of receiving all required application materials. Within sixty
days, the department shall make a final determination of costs and issue any remaining
authorized tax credits upon the final completion of the phased project, or request
repayment if an over-issuance of credits is determined.
3. The department shall determine, on an annual basis, the overall economic
impact to the state from the rehabilitation of eligible property pursuant to sections
99.720 to 99.730.
4. No taxpayer shall be issued tax credits for qualified conversion expenditures
on a qualified converted building within twenty-seven years of a previous issuance of tax
credits pursuant to sections 99.720 to 99.730 on such qualified converted building.
5. The department may promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to
administer the provisions of sections 99.720 to 99.730. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter

HB 2531 9
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act to
the contrary:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to sections 99.720 to 99.730 shall
automatically sunset on December 31, 2034, unless reauthorized by an act of the general
assembly;
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized pursuant to
sections 99.720 to 99.730 shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date
of the reauthorization;
(3) Sections 99.720 to 99.730 shall terminate on September first of the calendar
year immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
pursuant to sections 99.720 to 99.730 is sunset; and
(4) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit or in any way
impair:
(a) A taxpayer's ability to complete a project and receive authorization for tax
credits pursuant to sections 99.720 to 99.730 for any project for which the taxpayer has
submitted an initial application on or before the date the program authorized pursuant
to sections 99.720 to 99.730 expires; or
(b) The department of revenue's ability to redeem tax credits authorized on or
before the date the program authorized pursuant to sections 99.720 to 99.730 expires, or
a taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.
✔